Massachusetts, session 194th, H1623.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 6 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 116K, as
added by chapter 253 of the acts of 2020, the following section:-
SECTION 116L. (a) No law enforcement officer, law enforcement agency or department
shall purchase, obtain, use or allow to be used for law enforcement purposes on any person, a
chemical or substance that can produce rapidly in humans, sensory irritation or disabling
physical effects within a short time of exposure. Examples of such substance include “tear gas”
or “CS gas”.
(b) Whoever violates this section shall be punished by a criminal fine of $5,000.
of 1